Hawaii, session 2025, SB1611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 26, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§26- Governor's senior advisor for mental health and the justice system. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate and without regard to chapter 76, may appoint a senior advisor for mental health and the justice system. §26- Senior advisors to the governor; advice and consent of senate required. Any person who is appointed by the governor to serve as a senior adviser to the governor shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate." SECTION 2. Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-     Deputy directors; advice and consent of senate required.  Any person who is appointed to serve as the first deputy director of the department shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate; provided that if there is more than one deputy director and no deputy director is designated as the first deputy director, then all persons holding the title of deputy director shall be subject to the advice and consent of the senate." SECTION 3.  Section 346-381.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§346-381.5[]]  Governor's coordinator on homelessness.  The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the governor's coordinator on homelessness for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter without regard to chapter 76." SECTION 4.  (a) No later than the forty-first day of the regular session of 2026, the governor shall transmit governor's messages to the senate president containing nominations for each person who was appointed to their position before the effective date of this Act and whose position is made subject to senate advice and consent by this Act. (b)  No person nominated pursuant to subsection (a) shall continue to serve in that person's position after the adjournment sine die of the regular session of 2026 unless the person obtains the advice and consent of the senate. SECTION 5. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________